Arkansas, session 2025, HB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Breastfeeding and Lactation Consultants

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Breastfeeding and lactation consultant" means:
(i) An International Board Certified Lactation
Consultant; and
(ii)(a) A certified lactation counselor.
(b) The individuals listed under subdivision
(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this section are required to be supervised by a contracted
and in-network healthcare provider to receive reimbursement.
(B) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse the
individuals listed under subdivision (1)(A) of this section for breastfeeding
*ANS177*
04-02-2025 10:56:41 ANS177

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/12/25 H3/13/25 H3/20/25 S4/2/25 HB1333
and lactation consulting services if the individuals:
(i) Have a Medicaid number; or
(ii) Are otherwise compliant with all requirements
for reimbursement under the Arkansas Medicaid Program; (2)
"Breastfeeding and lactation consultant services" means medically appropriate
outpatient services or hospital services, or both, provided by a
breastfeeding and lactation consultant during pregnancy and through the
extended postpartum period to aid in milk expression or infant nutrition;
(3)(A) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage of
healthcare services from a healthcare insurer.
(B) "Enrollee" includes a minor child;
(4)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program, ARKids First-A or First-B, and the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Plans providing health benefits to state and
public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
04-02-2025 10:56:41 ANS177

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/12/25 H3/13/25 H3/20/25 S4/2/25 HB1333
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; and
(5)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, the Arkansas Medicaid
Program, or a nonprofit agricultural membership organization as defined in §
23-60-104.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits.

23-79-2902. Coverage for breastfeeding and lactation consultant
services.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or extended in this state shall provide
coverage for breastfeeding and lactation consultant services in an outpatient
setting to an enrollee.
(b) The coverage for breastfeeding and lactation consultant services
under subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Is not subject to an annual deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance limit as established for other covered benefits under a health
benefit plan; and
(2) Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a health benefit plan.

23-79-2903. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner may develop and promulgate rules for
the implementation and administration of this subchapter.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may develop and
promulgate rules for the implementation and administration of this subchapter
that may apply to the Arkansas Medicaid Program or the Arkansas Health and
04-02-2025 10:56:41 ANS177

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/12/25 H3/13/25 H3/20/25 S4/2/25 HB1333
Opportunity for Me Program established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.
(c) The State Board of Finance may develop and promulgate rules for
the administration of this subchapter for the plans providing health benefits
to state and public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.

/s/Hudson





























04-02-2025 10:56:41 ANS177